Massachusetts, session 194th, S681.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 32A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after section 17S the following section:-
Section 17T. The commission shall not reject a written verification or certification from a
health care provider, including, but not limited to, a qualified mental health care professional, for
accessing gender-affirming care, unless the written verification or certification clearly does not
satisfy minimum requirements under established clinical guidelines, nor shall the commission
require more than one written verification or certification that the care is required for the
treatment of gender dysphoria.
of 5

For purposes of this section, the term “qualified mental health care professional” shall,
unless the context clearly requires otherwise, mean a mental health professional who meets the
minimum credentials, training and standards of care for working with gender dysphoric adults
and adolescents developed by the World Professional Association for Transgender Health.
SECTION 2. Chapter 118E of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after section 10Q the following section:-
Section 10R. The division shall not reject a written verification or certification from a
health care provider, including, but not limited to, a qualified mental health care professional, for
accessing gender-affirming care, unless the written verification or certification clearly does not
satisfy minimum requirements under established clinical guidelines, nor shall the division require
more than one written verification or certification that the care is required for the treatment of
gender dysphoria.
For purposes of this section, the term “qualified mental health care professional” shall,
unless the context clearly requires otherwise, mean a mental health professional who meets the
minimum credentials, training and standards of care for working with gender dysphoric adults
and adolescents developed by the World Professional Association for Transgender Health.
SECTION 3. Chapter 175 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 47UU the following section:-
Section 47VV. No insurer or producer authorized to issue policies of insurance pursuant
to sections 108 or 110 shall reject a written verification or certification from a health care
provider, including, but not limited to, a qualified mental health care professional, for accessing
gender-affirming care, unless the written verification or certification clearly does not satisfy
of 5

minimum requirements under established clinical guidelines, nor shall any insurer or producer
require more than one written verification or certification that the care is required for the
treatment of gender dysphoria.
For purposes of this section, the term “qualified mental health care professional” shall,
unless the context clearly requires otherwise, mean a mental health professional who meets the
minimum credentials, training and standards of care for working with gender dysphoric adults
and adolescents developed by the World Professional Association for Transgender Health.
SECTION 4. Chapter 176A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 8VV the following section:-
Section 8WW. No corporation subject to this chapter shall reject a written verification or
certification from a health care provider, including, but not limited to, a qualified mental health
care professional, for accessing gender-affirming care, unless the written verification or
certification clearly does not satisfy minimum requirements under established clinical guidelines,
nor shall the corporation require more than one written verification or certification that the care
is required for the treatment of gender dysphoria.
For purposes of this section, the term “qualified mental health care professional” shall,
unless the context clearly requires otherwise, mean a mental health professional who meets the
minimum credentials, training and standards of care for working with gender dysphoric adults
and adolescents developed by the World Professional Association for Transgender Health.
SECTION 5. Chapter 176B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after section 4VV the following section:-
of 5

Section 4WW. No corporation subject to this chapter shall reject a written verification or
certification from a health care provider, including, but not limited to, a qualified mental health
care professional, for accessing gender-affirming care, unless the written verification or
certification clearly does not satisfy minimum requirements under established clinical guidelines,
nor shall the corporation require more than one written verification or certification that the care
is required for the treatment of gender dysphoria.
For purposes of this section, the term “qualified mental health care professional” shall,
unless the context clearly requires otherwise, mean a mental health professional who meets the
minimum credentials, training and standards of care for working with gender dysphoric adults
and adolescents developed by the World Professional Association for Transgender Health.
SECTION 6. Chapter 176G of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 4NN the following section:-
Section 4OO. No health maintenance organization subject to this chapter, and no officer
or agent thereof, shall reject a written verification or certification from a health care provider,
including, but not limited to, a qualified mental health care professional, for accessing gender-
affirming care, unless the written verification or certification clearly does not satisfy minimum
requirements under established clinical guidelines, nor shall a health maintenance organization
require more than one written verification or certification that the care is required for the
treatment of gender dysphoria.
For purposes of this section, the term “qualified mental health care professional” shall,
unless the context clearly requires otherwise, mean a mental health professional who meets the
of 5

minimum credentials, training and standards of care for working with gender dysphoric adults
and adolescents developed by the World Professional Association for Transgender Health.
of 5